Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-316
Mayor; pardons; remission of fines.

The mayor of a city of the first class shall have power after conviction to remit fines and forfeitures, and to grant reprieves and pardons for all offenses arising under the ordinances of the city.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 23, p. 235;

R.S.1913, § 4882;

C.S.1922, § 4050;

C.S.1929, § 16-312;

R.S.1943, § 16-316;

Laws 2019, LB194, § 10.